District of Columbia statutes.
42-3205

Notice not to be recalled.

Neither landlord nor tenant, after giving notice as aforesaid, shall be entitled to recall the notice so given without the consent of the other party, but after the expiration of the notice given by the tenant as aforesaid the landlord shall be entitled to the possession as if he had given the proper notice to quit; and after the expiration of the notice given by the landlord as aforesaid the tenant shall be entitled to quit as if he had given the proper notice of his intention to quit.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1382, ch. 854, § 1222
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 542, ch. 1329
1981 Ed., § 45-1405.
1973 Ed., § 45-905.